Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3783.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.01, subdivision 35, is amended to read: Subd. 35. Compounding. "Compounding" means preparing, mixing, assembling, packaging, and labeling a drug for an identified individual patient as a result of a practitioner's prescription drug order. Compounding also includes anticipatory compounding, as defined in this section, and the preparation of drugs in which all bulk drug substances and components are nonprescription substances. Compounding does not include mixing or reconstituting a drug according to the product's labeling or to the manufacturer's directions, provided that such labeling has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration (FDA) or the manufacturer is licensed under section 151.252. Compounding does not include the preparation of a drug for the purpose of, or incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis, provided that the drug is not prepared for dispensing or administration to patients. All compounding, regardless of the type of product, must be done pursuant to a prescription drug order unless otherwise permitted in this chapter or by the rules of the board. Compounding does not include a minor deviation from such directions with regard to radioactivity, volume, or stability, which is made by or under the supervision of a licensed nuclear pharmacist or a physician, and which is necessary in order to accommodate circumstances not contemplated in the manufacturer's instructions, such as the rate of radioactive decay or geographical distance from the patient.new text begin Compounding does not include the use of a flavoring agent to flavor a drug.new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 151.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 44. new text end new text begin Flavoring agent. new text end new text begin "Flavoring agent" means a therapeutically inert, nonallergenic substance consisting of inactive ingredients that is added to a drug to improve the drug's taste and palatability. new text end